Utah statutes.
63G-6-407.   Use of alkaline paper.

(1)  As used in this section, "alkaline paper" means paper that is acid-free, manufactured with calcium carbonate as the principal filler, and meets standards for paper approved by the American National Standards Institute, National Information Standards Organization, and American Society for Testing and Materials.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Section 63G-6-401, which requires public procurement units to purchase products from the lowest responsible bidder, and except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), every public procurement unit shall purchase and use alkaline paper.

(b)  A public procurement unit shall purchase alkaline paper unless:

(i)  the bid or purchase price for alkaline paper or alkaline recycled paper exceeds the lowest responsive and responsible bidder whose bid meets the requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation for bids;

(ii)  there is no alkaline or alkaline recycled paper reasonably available that meets the requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation for bids; or

(iii)  other paper products have equal or better quality characteristics than alkaline paper and meet standards for paper approved by the American National Standards Institute, National Information Standards Organization, and American Society for Testing and Materials.

(3)  The state archivist shall promote the use of alkaline paper within state government, local units of government, and school districts.

